Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.08.020

Qualifications of directors.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may prescribe qualifications for directors. A director need not be a resident of this state or a shareholder of the corporation unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws so prescribe.

[ 1989 c 165 s 81.]